West Virginia, session 2026, HB4123.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2D. DIVISION OF PROTECTIVE SERVICES. §15-2D-6. Capitol Police pay equity salary adjustment. (a) The Legislature hereby finds that the West Virginia Division of Protective Services, also known as the Capitol Police, has been having difficulty retaining employees of all types.(b) The Legislature hereby directs that a pay equity salary adjustment and increase be provided to all employees of the Capitol Police that are employed at all Capitol Complex properties.  (c) This salary adjustment shall be as follows:(1) On July 1, 2026, all Capitol police officers and all support staff shall be given an increase in annual pay of $5,000; (2) On July 1, 2027, all Capitol police officers shall be given an increase in annual pay of $5,000;(3) ) On July 1, 2028, all Capitol police officers shall be given an increase in annual pay of $5,000; and(4) ) On July 1, 2029, all Capitol police officers shall be given an increase in annual pay of $5,000.(d) Funding for the pay rates for all employees of the Division of Protective Services shall be provided from the Capitol Police general revenue appropriations.(e) In the event any provision of this section conflicts with any rule, policy, or provision of this code, this section shall control.  The provisions of this section are rehabilitative in nature and it is the specific intent of the Legislature that no private cause of action, either express or implied, shall arise pursuant to the provisions or implementation of this section.